Hawaii statutes.
§651-19 Recording discharge. Whenever
an order has been made discharging or releasing an attachment upon real
property, a certified copy of the order may be recorded in the office in which
a copy of the writ has been recorded under section 651-9 and be indexed in like
manner. All expenses relating to the attachment shall be paid by the
plaintiff. [L 1905, c 84, §19; RL 1925, §2823; RL 1935, §4208; RL 1945, §10159;
RL 1955, §233-19; am L 1966, c 33, §8; HRS §651-19]

Case Notes

Section not applicable where an order discharging or
releasing an attachment upon real property has not been made. 3 H. App. 89,
641 P.2d 989 (1982).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next